Utah statutes.
67-5-20.   Internet crimes against children -- Education programs.
(1) (a)  The attorney general may assist in efforts to prevent and prosecute
Internet crimes against children, including working with other agencies of
state and local government.
(b)  Under Subsection (1)(a), the attorney general may administer the Internet
Crimes Against Children Task Force, which is a statewide multidisciplinary and
multijurisdictional task force that investigates, prevents, and prosecutes
sexual exploitation offenses against children by offenders who use the
Internet, online communications systems, or other computer technology.
(2) (a)  As part of the attorney general's participation in this task force,
the attorney general shall make available, to the extent legislative funding
is available, statewide training and informational materials regarding
Internet safety for children that focuses on prevention, reporting, and
assistance regarding Internet crimes against children.
(b)  The training and information shall include programs and information
specifically designed for:
(i)  children, which shall include classroom presentations and informative
leaflets or other printed material; and
(ii)  parents, guardians, educators, school resource officers, parent-teacher
organizations, and libraries, which shall include Internet safety,
technological protection measures, and effective supervision and review of
children's use of the Internet, including locating and assessing sites
children have had contact with.
(c)  As possible, the attorney general shall direct that the task force work
with state and local agencies that provide information and programs to prevent
and prosecute Internet crimes against children to ensure the most effective
use of resources.
